Louisiana, session 2026, HB280.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:574.4(B)(2), (D)(1), (E)(1), (F)(1), (G)(1), and (J)(1) are hereby
amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§574.4. Parole; eligibility; juvenile offenders
* * *
B.
* * *
(2) Except as provided in R.S. 15:574.22, any person serving a life sentence,
with or without the benefit of parole, who has not been convicted of a crime of
violence as defined by R.S. 14:2(B), a sex offense as defined by R.S. 15:541, or an
offense, regardless of the date of conviction, which would constitute a crime of
violence as defined by R.S. 14:2(B) or a sex offense as defined by R.S. 15:541, shall
be eligible for parole consideration as follows:
(a) If the person was at least eighteen years of age and under the age of
twenty-five years at the time he was sentenced to life imprisonment, he shall be
eligible for parole consideration if all of the following conditions have been met:
Page 1 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 280 ENROLLED
(i) The person has served at least twenty-five years of the sentence imposed.
(ii) The person has obtained a low risk level designation determined by a
validated risk assessment instrument approved by the secretary of the Department
of Public Safety and Corrections. The person has met the requirements listed in
Subparagraphs (A)(4)(b) through (f) of this Section.
(iii) The person has not committed any major disciplinary offenses in the
thirty-six consecutive months prior to the parole hearing date. A major disciplinary
offense is an offense identified as a Schedule B offense by the Department of Public
Safety and Corrections in the Disciplinary Rules and Procedures for Adult Offenders.
(iv) The person has completed the mandatory minimum of one hundred
hours of pre-release programming in accordance with the provisions of R.S.
15:827.1, if such programming is available at the facility where the offender is
incarcerated.
(v) The person has completed substance abuse treatment, if applicable and
such treatment is available at the facility where the offender is incarcerated.
(vi) The person has obtained or completed at least one of the following:
(aa) A literacy program.
(bb) An adult basic education program.
(cc) A job skills training program.
(dd) A high school equivalency certificate.
(b) If the person was at least twenty-five years of age and under the age of
thirty-five years at the time he was sentenced to life imprisonment, he shall be
eligible for parole consideration if all of the following conditions have been met:
(i) The person has served at least twenty years of the sentence imposed.
(ii) The person has obtained a low risk level designation determined by a
validated risk assessment instrument approved by the secretary of the Department
of Public Safety and Corrections. The person has met the requirements listed in
Subparagraphs (A)(4)(b) through (f) of this Section.
Page 2 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 280 ENROLLED
(iii) The person has not committed any major disciplinary offenses in the
thirty-six consecutive months prior to the parole hearing date. A major disciplinary
offense is an offense identified as a Schedule B offense by the Department of Public
Safety and Corrections in the Disciplinary Rules and Procedures for Adult Offenders.
(iv) The person has completed the mandatory minimum of one hundred
hours of pre-release programming in accordance with the provisions of R.S.
15:827.1, if such programming is available at the facility where the offender is
incarcerated.
(v) The person has completed substance abuse treatment, if applicable and
such treatment is available at the facility where the offender is incarcerated.
(vi) The person has obtained or completed at least one of the following:
(aa) A literacy program.
(bb) An adult basic education program.
(cc) A job skills training program.
(dd) A high school equivalency certificate.
(c) If the person was at least thirty-five years of age and under the age of
fifty years at the time he was sentenced to life imprisonment, he shall be eligible for
parole consideration if all of the following conditions have been met:
(i) The person has served at least fifteen years of the sentence imposed.
(ii) The person has obtained a low risk level designation determined by a
validated risk assessment instrument approved by the secretary of the Department
of Public Safety and Corrections. The person has met the requirements listed in
Subparagraphs (A)(4)(b) through (f) of this Section.
(iii) The person has not committed any major disciplinary offenses in the
thirty-six consecutive months prior to the parole hearing date. A major disciplinary
offense is an offense identified as a Schedule B offense by the Department of Public
Safety and Corrections in the Disciplinary Rules and Procedures for Adult Offenders.
Page 3 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 280 ENROLLED
(iv) The person has completed the mandatory minimum of one hundred
hours of pre-release programming in accordance with the provisions of R.S.
15:827.1, if such programming is available at the facility where the offender is
incarcerated.
(v) The person has completed substance abuse treatment, if applicable and
such treatment is available at the facility where the offender is incarcerated.
(vi) The person has obtained or completed at least one of the following:
(aa) A literacy program.
(bb) An adult basic education program.
(cc) A job skills training program.
(dd) A high school equivalency certificate.
(d) If the person was at least fifty years of age at the time he was sentenced
to life imprisonment, he shall be eligible for parole consideration if all of the
following conditions have been met:
(i) The person has served at least ten years of the sentence imposed.
(ii) The person has obtained a low risk level designation determined by a
validated risk assessment instrument approved by the secretary of the Department
of Public Safety and Corrections. The person has met the requirements listed in
Subparagraphs (A)(4)(b) through (f) of this Section.
(iii) The person has not committed any major disciplinary offenses in the
thirty-six consecutive months prior to the parole hearing date. A major disciplinary
offense is an offense identified as a Schedule B offense by the Department of Public
Safety and Corrections in the Disciplinary Rules and Procedures for Adult Offenders.
(iv) The person has completed the mandatory minimum of one hundred
hours of pre-release programming in accordance with the provisions of R.S.
15:827.1, if such programming is available at the facility where the offender is
incarcerated.
(v) The person has completed substance abuse treatment if applicable and
such treatment is available at the facility where the offender is incarcerated.
Page 4 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 280 ENROLLED
(vi) The person has obtained or completed at least one of the following:
(aa) A literacy program.
(bb) An adult basic education program.
(cc) A job skills training program.
(dd) A high school equivalency certificate.
* * *
D.(1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any person
serving a sentence of life imprisonment who was under the age of eighteen years at
the time of the commission of the offense, except for a person serving a life sentence
for a conviction of first degree murder (R.S. 14:30) or second degree murder (R.S.
14:30.1), shall be eligible for parole consideration pursuant to the provisions of this
Subsection if all of the following conditions have been met:
(a) The offender has served twenty-five years of the sentence imposed.
(b) The offender has not committed any major disciplinary offenses in the
thirty-six consecutive months prior to the parole hearing date. A major disciplinary
offense is an offense identified as a Schedule B offense by the Department of Public
Safety and Corrections in the Disciplinary Rules and Procedures for Adult Offenders.
The offender has met the requirements listed in Subparagraphs (A)(4)(b) through (f)
of this Section.
(c) The offender has completed the mandatory minimum of one hundred
hours of prerelease programming in accordance with R.S. 15:827.1.
(d) The offender has completed substance abuse treatment as applicable.
(e) The offender has obtained or completed at least one of the following:
(i) A literacy program.
(ii) An adult basic education program.
(iii) A job skills training program.
(iv) A high school equivalency certificate.
(f) The offender has obtained a low-risk level designation determined by a
validated risk assessment instrument approved by the secretary of the Department
of Public Safety and Corrections.
Page 5 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 280 ENROLLED
(g) The offender has completed a reentry program to be determined by the
Department of Public Safety and Corrections.
(h) (c) If the offender was convicted of aggravated or first degree rape, he
shall be designated a sex offender and upon release shall comply with all sex
offender registration and notification provisions as required by law.
* * *
E.(1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary and except as
provided in Subsection G of this Section, any person serving a sentence of life
imprisonment for a conviction of first degree murder (R.S. 14:30) who was under the
age of eighteen years at the time of the commission of the offense and whose
indictment for the offense is on or after August 1, 2017, shall be eligible for parole
consideration pursuant to the provisions of this Subsection if a judicial determination
has been made that the person is entitled to parole eligibility pursuant to Code of
Criminal Procedure Article 878.1(A) and all of the following conditions have been
met:
(a) The offender has served twenty-five years of the sentence imposed.
(b) The offender has not committed any major disciplinary offenses in the
thirty-six consecutive months prior to the parole hearing date. A major disciplinary
offense is an offense identified as a Schedule B offense by the Department of Public
Safety and Corrections in the Disciplinary Rules and Procedures for Adult Offenders.
The offender has met the requirements listed in Subparagraphs (A)(4)(b) through (f)
of this Section.
(c) The offender has completed the mandatory minimum of one hundred
hours of prerelease programming in accordance with R.S. 15:827.1.
(d) The offender has completed substance abuse treatment as applicable.
(e) The offender has obtained or completed at least one of the following:
(i) A literacy program.
(ii) An adult basic education program.
Page 6 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 280 ENROLLED
(iii) A job skills training program.
(iv) A high school equivalency certificate.
(f) The offender has obtained a low-risk level designation determined by a
validated risk assessment instrument approved by the secretary of the Department
of Public Safety and Corrections.
(g) The offender has completed a reentry program to be determined by the
Department of Public Safety and Corrections.
* * *
F.(1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary and except as
provided in Subsection G of this Section, any person serving a sentence of life
imprisonment for a conviction of second degree murder (R.S. 14:30.1) who was
under the age of eighteen years at the time of the commission of the offense and
whose indictment for the offense is on or after August 1, 2017, shall be eligible for
parole consideration if all of the following conditions have been met:
(a) The offender has served twenty-five years of the sentence imposed.
(b) The offender has not committed any major disciplinary offenses in the
thirty-six consecutive months prior to the parole hearing date. A major disciplinary
offense is an offense identified as a Schedule B offense by the Department of Public
Safety and Corrections in the Disciplinary Rules and Procedures for Adult Offenders.
The offender has met the requirements listed in Subparagraphs (A)(4)(b) through (f)
of this Section.
(c) The offender has completed the mandatory minimum of one hundred
hours of pre-release programming in accordance with R.S. 15:827.1.
(d) The offender has completed substance abuse treatment as applicable.
(e) The offender has obtained or completed at least one of the following:
(i) A literacy program.
(ii) An adult basic education program.
(iii) A job skills training program.
(iv) A high school equivalency certificate.
Page 7 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 280 ENROLLED
(f) The offender has obtained a low-risk level designation determined by a
validated risk assessment instrument approved by the secretary of the Department
of Public Safety and Corrections.
(g) The offender has completed a reentry program to be determined by the
Department of Public Safety and Corrections.
* * *
G.(1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any person
serving a sentence of life imprisonment for a conviction of first degree murder (R.S.
14:30) or second degree murder (R.S. 14:30.1) who was under the age of eighteen
years at the time of the commission of the offense and whose indictment for the
offense was prior to August 1, 2017, shall be eligible for parole consideration
pursuant to the provisions of this Subsection if a judicial determination has been
made that the person is entitled to parole eligibility pursuant to Code of Criminal
Procedure Article 878.1(B) and all of the following conditions have been met:
(a) The offender has served twenty-five years of the sentence imposed.
(b) The offender has not committed any major disciplinary offenses in the
thirty-six consecutive months prior to the parole hearing date. A major disciplinary
offense is an offense identified as a Schedule B offense by the Department of Public
Safety and Corrections in the Disciplinary Rules and Procedures for Adult Offenders.
The offender has met the requirements listed in Subparagraphs (A)(4)(b) through (f)
of this Section.
(c) The offender has completed the mandatory minimum of one hundred
hours of pre-release programming in accordance with R.S. 15:827.1.
(d) The offender has completed substance abuse treatment as applicable.
(e) The offender has obtained or completed at least one of the following:
(i) A literacy program.
(ii) An adult basic education program.
(iii) A job skills training program.
(iv) A high school equivalency certificate.
Page 8 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 280 ENROLLED
(f) The offender has obtained a low-risk level designation determined by a
validated risk assessment instrument approved by the secretary of the Department
of Public Safety and Corrections.
(g) The offender has completed a reentry program to be determined by the
Department of Public Safety and Corrections.
* * *
J.(1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, and except as
provided in Subsections D, E, F, G, and H D through H of this Section, any person
serving a term or terms of imprisonment that result in a period of incarceration of
twenty-five years or more and who was under the age of eighteen years at the time
of the commission of the offense shall be eligible for parole consideration pursuant
to the provisions of this Subsection if all of the following conditions have been met:
(a) The offender has served at least twenty-five years of the sentence
imposed.
(b) The offender has not committed any major disciplinary offenses in the
thirty-six consecutive months prior to the parole hearing date. A major disciplinary
offense is an offense identified as a Schedule B offense by the Department of Public
Safety and Corrections in the Disciplinary Rules and Procedures for Adult Offenders.
The offender has met the requirements listed in Subparagraphs (A)(4)(b) through (f)
of this Section.
(c) The offender has completed the mandatory minimum of one hundred
hours of prerelease programming in accordance with R.S. 15:827.1.
(d) The offender has completed substance abuse treatment as applicable.
(e) The offender has obtained or completed at least one of the following:
(i) A literacy program.
(ii) An adult basic education program.
(iii) A job skills training program.
(iv) A high school equivalency certificate.
Page 9 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 280 ENROLLED
(f) The offender has obtained a low-risk level designation determined by a
validated risk assessment instrument approved by the secretary of the Department
of Public Safety and Corrections.
(g) The offender has completed a reentry program to be determined by the
Department of Public Safety and Corrections.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 10 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.